Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 3
WATER MAINS AND OTHER IMPROVEMENTS - CITIES AND TOWNS

31-35-301. Construction of water mains.

When any city or town is the owner of a municipal water plant with water mains in operation throughout the greater portion of said city or town and is unable to extend the same so as to cover the entire area contained within the municipal limits of said city or town, the citizens and resident taxpayers of any area containing four blocks or more situated in said city or town not having water mains therein may agree among themselves or a majority of the owners of the lots therein for the construction of the same. Upon application to the governing body by a majority of such owners, the governing body shall have authority to enter into a contract with said owners of said four blocks or more or with the majority thereof to allow them to construct such water mains in such territory and to connect the same with the supply of water of said city or town. The governing body has authority to enter into a contract with such citizens to allow all the proceeds derived from water rentals going to such addition through such water mains and collected as rental therefor to be applied to the payment of such water pipes, the cost thereof to be limited by the city or town to not more than the actual cost thereof upon any basis by which the city or town itself could secure the construction of the same. Said payments shall be made without interest and upon such terms not exceeding ten years as may be agreed upon by contract between the parties thereto.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1248, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-301 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-302. Petition - plans - contract.

For the purpose of carrying the provisions of this section and section 31-35-301 into effect, the owners of four blocks or more situated in any city or town in this state owning its own municipal water plant which has not been supplied with water mains shall present a petition to the governing body, offering therein to construct such water mains and pipes in the streets and alleys of said city or town in such manner and at such places and of such sizes as the said governing body may require and at a cost to said city or town as low as the same could be constructed by said city or town.

Upon receipt of such petition, the governing body shall prepare plans and specifications for the supplying of said territory with water mains and pipes, and the petitioners, upon the inspection of said plans and specifications, shall state their willingness to construct the same at a certain price to be paid for out of the revenues derived from water running through said pipes in said district, the same to be charged at no higher rate than the remainder of said city or town is paying. If such proposition is satisfactory to the governing body, it has the right to enter into a contract with said petitioners upon behalf of said city or town for the construction of such water mains and pipes according to said plans and specifications and for the price agreed upon, not more than that specified, and within a time to be set by said governing body.

Upon the completion of said works by said petitioners, the city or town shall inspect and, if satisfactory, accept the same and issue certificates of indebtedness therefor stating therein how the same is to be paid out of the proceeds from such water rentals collected from the territory in which said extensions are made, unless otherwise sooner arranged for by said city or town, and proceed to operate and maintain the same and collect the revenues therefrom and to apply the same to the payment of the indebtedness created for the construction of said pipes without interest until the same is paid for or until said city or town makes payment therefor in some other manner. Said rentals shall be paid upon said certificates from time to time when the amount of one hundred dollars is received from said rentals for that purpose, and said rentals shall be set apart and kept as a separate fund and used for the purposes provided in this subsection (3) only until the entire indebtedness is paid.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1249, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-302 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-303. Necessity declared by ordinance.

When, in the opinion of the governing body, it is necessary to make any public improvement, including the establishment, extending, widening, grading, or improving of any street or alley, or the establishment, construction, extending, enlarging, or completing of any sewer, sidewalk, bridge, or viaduct, or removing any irrigating ditch, it is lawful for said body to declare by ordinance the necessity for such improvement.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1249, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-303 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-304. Streets and alleys - eminent domain.

In case such proposed improvements consist of the establishment, opening, extending, or widening of any street or alley in such city or town and it is necessary to take private property to make such improvement, said ordinance shall declare such necessity, specifying and describing the property to be taken. Thereupon such city or town, by its governing body and its duly authorized officers, may exercise the right of eminent domain and may condemn, take, or damage any private property that may be necessarily condemned, taken, or damaged in the making of such improvement. The manner of proceeding in such cases shall be as prescribed by the laws of this state for the condemnation of lands in other cases.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1249, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-304 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For proceedings under eminent domain, see article 1 of title 38.

31-35-305. Sidewalks - assessment - hearing - lien.

In case such proposed improvement consists of the establishment, construction, extending, or completing of any sidewalk in said city or town, the ordinance shall specify the property in front of which the sidewalk is to be constructed, extended, or completed; the names of the owners of said property; and the length, width, grade, and material of which the sidewalk is to be constructed. The governing body, as soon thereafter as the cost of said improvements can be definitely ascertained, shall assess the cost thereof upon the lots respectively in front of which said sidewalk is to be constructed. Such assessment, when completed, shall be subject to inspection by any interested person. Notice of the making and completion of the assessment shall be given by the publication of a notice to the effect that said assessment has been made upon said lots and is ready for inspection. The notice shall be published at least once a week for four successive weeks in some newspaper published or of general circulation in said city or town and shall designate a day upon which the governing body shall sit for the purpose of hearing objections thereto and making corrections therein. Upon the day designated, the governing body shall sit for said purpose and hear any objections that may be made and shall thereupon make any such changes in said assessments as may in their judgment be necessary, equitable, or just and shall thereupon finally determine such assessments. Such assessments, when so finally determined, shall be a lien upon the property so assessed for the purpose of making said improvement. An appeal shall lie to any court of competent jurisdiction from any decision of such governing body.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1250, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-305 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-306. Other laws not affected.

Nothing in this part 3 shall abridge or otherwise affect the right to make public improvements by virtue of any other laws of this state.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1250, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-306 as it existed prior to 1975.